Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article VII, section 1, will read: new text end Section 1. Every person 18 years of age or more who has been a citizen of the United States for three months and who has resided in the precinct for 30 days next preceding an election shall be entitled to vote in that precinct. new text begin In addition, every person 18 years of age or more who has been a citizen of the United States and resident of this state for three months and who is the owner of nonhomesteaded agricultural land, real property that is both nonhomesteaded and noncommercial, or commercial or industrial real property on which the owner conducts a small business as defined by law may vote in the precinct where the real property is located on any question concerning a local levy or bond referendum. new text end The place of voting by one otherwise qualified who has changed his residence within 30 days preceding the election shall be prescribed by law. The following persons shall not be entitled or permitted to vote at any election in this state: A person not meeting the above requirements; a person who has been convicted of treason or felony, unless restored to civil rights; a person under guardianship, or a person who is insane or not mentally competent. Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to allow a person who owns certain land in a precinct but is not a resident of the precinct to vote on local levy or bond referendums in the precinct where the land is located? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . " new text end